src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON 634
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>n # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>n # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>ne # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>ne # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>t # ;
 +Comp:%>nare # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>nast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>naste # ;

LEXICON 647
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>grov # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>grov # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>grove # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>grove # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>grovt # ;
 +Comp:%>grøvre # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>grøvst # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>grøvste # ;

LEXICON 649
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>øyen # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>øyen # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>øgne # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>øgne # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>øye # ;
 +Comp:%>øgnare # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>øgnast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>øgnaste # ;

LEXICON 651
 +Comp:%>re # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>arst # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>arste # ;

LEXICON 662
 +Pos+Mask+Ub+Eint:%>eigen # ;
 +Pos+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eiga # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>eige # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>eigne # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>eigne # ;

LEXICON 66A
 +Pos+Mask+Ub+Eint:%>liten # ;
 +Pos+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>lita # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>lite # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>litle # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>små # ;
 +Comp:%>mindre # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>minst # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>minste # ;

! === Manglande paradigme lagt til frå Ordbank fullformer ===

LEXICON 534
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>mal # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>mal # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Pl+Indef:%>le # ; ! pos fl LINE=2
 +Sg+Def:%>le # ; ! pos bu eint LINE=3
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>malt # ; ! pos nøyt ub eint LINE=4

LEXICON 536
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Pl+Indef:%>e # ; ! pos fl LINE=2
 +Sg+Def:%>e # ; ! pos bu eint LINE=3
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>tt # ; ! pos nøyt ub eint LINE=4

LEXICON 537
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Pl+Indef:%> # ; ! pos fl LINE=2
 +Sg+Def:%> # ; ! pos bu eint LINE=3
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>tt # ; ! pos nøyt ub eint LINE=4

LEXICON 554
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Pl+Indef:%>te # ; ! pos fl LINE=2
 +Sg+Def:%>te # ; ! pos bu eint LINE=3
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%> # ; ! pos nøyt ub eint LINE=4
 +Comp:%>tare # ; ! komp LINE=5
 +Superl+Indef:%>tast # ; ! sup ub LINE=6
 +Superl+Def:%>taste # ; ! sup bu LINE=7

LEXICON 572H
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>en # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>en # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Pl+Indef:%>ne # ; ! pos fl LINE=2
 +Sg+Def:%>ne # ; ! pos bu eint LINE=3
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>ent # ; ! pos nøyt ub eint LINE=4

LEXICON 579
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>en # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>en # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Pl+Indef:%>ne # ; ! pos fl LINE=2
 +Sg+Def:%>ne # ; ! pos bu eint LINE=3
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>e # ; ! pos nøyt ub eint LINE=4

LEXICON 525
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ; ! pos mask ub eint LINE=1

LEXICON 620
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>n # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>n # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%> # ; ! pos nøyt ub eint LINE=4

LEXICON 663
 +Pos+Mask+Ub+Eint:%>liten # ; ! pos mask ub eint LINE=1
 +Pos+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>lita # ; ! pos fem ub eint LINE=2
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>lite # ; ! pos nøyt ub eint LINE=3
 +Sg+Def:%>litle # ; ! pos bu eint LINE=4
 +Pl+Indef:%>små # ; ! pos fl LINE=5

LEXICON 664
 +Pos+Mask+Ub+Eint:%>liten # ; ! pos mask ub eint LINE=1
 +Pos+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>lita # ; ! pos fem ub eint LINE=2
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>lite # ; ! pos nøyt ub eint LINE=3
 +Sg+Def:%>litle # ; ! pos bu eint LINE=4
 +Pl+Indef:%>småe # ; ! pos fl LINE=5

LEXICON 667
 +Pos+Mask+Ub+Eint:%>liten # ; ! pos mask ub eint LINE=1
 +Pos+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>lita # ; ! pos fem ub eint LINE=2
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>lite # ; ! pos nøyt ub eint LINE=3
 +Sg+Def:%>vesle # ; ! pos bu eint LINE=4
 +Pl+Indef:%>vesle # ; ! pos fl LINE=5

LEXICON 66EG
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ; ! pos m/f ub eint LINE=1
 +Pl+Indef:%>e # ; ! pos fl LINE=2
 +Sg+Def:%>e # ; ! pos bu eint LINE=3
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>tt # ; ! pos nøyt ub eint LINE=4
 +Comp:%>ærre # ; ! komp LINE=5
 +Superl+Indef:%>æst # ; ! sup ub LINE=6
 +Superl+Def:%>æste # ; ! sup bu LINE=7
