src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
alderdomsslø+A:alderdomsslø 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=834
ansvarsfri+A:ansvarsfri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=2239
antrasittgrå+A:antrasittgrå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=132044
armsliten+A:armslit 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=2923
asurblå+A:asurblå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=3257
attre+A:att 651 ; ! LEMMA_ID=3366
avgiftsfri+A:avgiftsfri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=4122
bakre+A:bak 651 ; ! LEMMA_ID=4900
birren+A:bir 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=7347
blanksliten+A:blankslit 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=133229
bleikblå+A:bleikblå 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=7781
blygrå+A:blygrå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=8397
bondeblå+A:bondeblå 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=8945
bortkommen+A:bortkom 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=9183
CO2-fri+A:CO2-fri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=131867
daggammal+A:daggam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=13008
dauddrukken+A:dauddruk 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=13339
djupgrå+A:djupgrå 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=14419
dropfri+A:dropfri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=15319
drubben+A:drub 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=15360
dåfallen+A:dåfal 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=16471
døddrukken+A:døddruk 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=13338
dødssliten+A:dødsslit 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=134890
døgergammal+A:døgergam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=16255
døgngammal+A:døgngam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=16257
eksamensfri+A:eksamensfri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=17401
eldgammal+A:eldgam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=17761
fallen+A:fal 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=19618
fartsgalen+A:fartsgal 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=20006
feittfri+A:feittfri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=20429
fiolblå+A:fiolblå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=21569
fjellblå+A:fjellblå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=22049
fjorgammal+A:fjorgam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=22286
folkefri+A:folkefri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=23672
fonnesliten+A:fonneslit 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=23921
fordrukken+A:fordruk 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24128
forhippen+A:forhip 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24408
forsliten+A:forslit 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=25028
fosfatfri+A:fosfatfri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=25499
framvaksen+A:framvaks 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=26095
frostfri+A:frostfri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=26897
fråfallen+A:fråfal 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=27169
furten+A:furt 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=27553
gebrokken+A:gebrok 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=29717
godlåten+A:godlåt 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=31625
grebben+A:greb 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=32345
grov+A:gr 647 ; ! LEMMA_ID=32728
grovskoren+A:grovskor 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=32777
gråblå+A:gråblå 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=33250
gråskitten+A:gråskit 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=136813
gulgrå+A:gulgrå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=33504
gulmogen+A:gulmog 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=33610
halvgammal+A:halvgam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=34506
halvgjengen+A:halvgjeng 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=34509
halvtårsgammal+A:halvtårsgam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=34664
halvårsgammal+A:halvårsgam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=34662
handfallen+A:handfal 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=34964
handfri+A:handfri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=124503
handskoren+A:handskor 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=137039
haustgammal+A:haustgam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=35633
heimkommen+A:heimkom 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=36142
heimtrå+A:heimtrå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=36203
himmelblå+A:himmelblå 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=37059
hot+A:hot 554 ; ! LEMMA_ID=138746
hovudgalen+A:hovudgal 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=38218
hovudtullen+A:hovudtul 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=38315
hundgammal+A:hundgam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=38647
iblå+A:iblå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=40222
igrå+A:igrå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=40418
ihopvaksen+A:ihopvaks 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=40457
ihugkommen+A:ihugkom 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=40463
indigoblå+A:indigoblå 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=40848
innfallen+A:innfal 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=41364
innsokken+A:innsok 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=41718
islaupen+A:islaup 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=42331
jamgammal+A:jamgam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=42641
jamn+A:jam 634 ; ! LEMMA_ID=42666
karakterfri+A:karakterfri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=44942
klabben+A:klab 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=46804
knabben+A:knab 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=48032
knøttliten+A:knøtt 663 ; ! LEMMA_ID=48494
koboltblå+A:koboltblå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=48518
koffeinfri+A:koffeinfri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=139109
kommen+A:kom 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=48959
kommunegrå+A:kommunegrå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=139343
kongeblå+A:kongeblå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=49359
kornblå+A:kornblå 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=50180
kvalitetsmedveten+A:kvalitetsmedvet 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=52397
kvitgrå+A:kvitgrå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=53135
langfri+A:langfri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=139888
liten+A:liten 66A ; ! LEMMA_ID=55851
litenvoren+A:litenvoren 525 ; ! LEMMA_ID=126321
liveigen+A:liveig 662 ; ! LEMMA_ID=55953
ljosblå+A:ljosblå 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=56237
ljosgrå+A:ljosgrå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=56292
lyseblå+A:lyseblå 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=56239
lysgrå+A:lysgrå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=56294
løyen+A:lø 649 ; ! LEMMA_ID=58329
mannjamn+A:mannjam 634 ; ! LEMMA_ID=59149
marineblå+A:marineblå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=59302
matlei+A:matlei 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=59683
medveten+A:medvet 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=59974
mellomblå+A:mellomblå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=60160
midtre+A:midt 651 ; ! LEMMA_ID=60795
misjamn+A:misjam 634 ; ! LEMMA_ID=61214
motfallen+A:motfal 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=61577
musegrå+A:musegrå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=62557
mykjen+A:mykje 620 ; ! LEMMA_ID=126354
månadsgammal+A:månadsgam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=63345
mørkegrå+A:mørkegrå 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=63045
nattgammal+A:nattgam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=63765
naudliten+A:naud 664 ; ! LEMMA_ID=63962
nedforkommen+A:nedforkom 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=64161
nedsliten+A:nedslit 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=64227
nødkommen+A:nødkom 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=63954
nøyen+A:nø 649 ; ! LEMMA_ID=65912
ormstukken+A:ormstuk 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=67836
oskegrå+A:oskegrå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=67905
ovgalen+A:ovgal 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=68480
ovgammal+A:ovgam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=68482
ovliten+A:ov 667 ; ! LEMMA_ID=68505
perlegrå+A:perlegrå 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=69650
problemfri+A:problemfri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=71699
rett-truen+A:rett-tru 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=74772
rettkommen+A:rettkom 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=74751
rusfri+A:rusfri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=127165
safirblå+A:safirblå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=76867
saneringsmoden+A:saneringsmod 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=77784
seinkommen+A:seinkom 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=78322
sjølveigen+A:sjølveig 662 ; ! LEMMA_ID=80774
skadefri+A:skadefri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=81133
skitengrå+A:skitengrå 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=82079
skitgrå+A:skitgrå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=82110
skittgrå+A:skittgrå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=82111
skolelei+A:skolelei 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=140038
skulelei+A:skulelei 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=140037
slagen+A:slag 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=85211
smertefri+A:smertefri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=86216
små+A:små 66EG ; ! LEMMA_ID=115439
småskoren+A:småskor 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=86585
snurren+A:snur 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=87021
spelefri+A:spelefri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=125885
spinngalen+A:spinngal 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=88413
stadeigen+A:stadeig 662 ; ! LEMMA_ID=89093
steingammal+A:steingam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=89588
steingrå+A:steingrå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=89594
sterkvaksen+A:sterkvaks 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=89797
strykefri+A:strykefri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=91044
stygg-gammal+A:stygg-gam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=91452
styggammal+A:styggam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=91454
stålblå+A:stålblå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=91842
sveisen+A:sveis 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=92614
særeigen+A:særeig 662 ; ! LEMMA_ID=93525
søvndrukken+A:søvndruk 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=92738
tenestefri+A:tenestefri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=125886
tilsegkommen+A:tilsegkom 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=96550
tiltøken+A:tiltøk 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=96671
trestroken+A:trestrok 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=98896
turkisblå+A:turkisblå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=100730
turr-ròten+A:turr-ròt 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=100827
tverrbrå+A:tverrbrå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=101114
tørr-ròten+A:tørr-ròt 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=102171
ufallen+A:ufal 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=102742
ugrasfri+A:ugrasfri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=103004
ujamn+A:ujam 634 ; ! LEMMA_ID=103180
umedviten+A:umedvit 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=103791
umisjamn+A:umisjam 634 ; ! LEMMA_ID=103836
unnfallen+A:unnfal 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=124488
urgammal+A:urgam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=104857
uskyldsblå+A:uskyldsblå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=105125
utgammal+A:utgam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=105830
utorfallen+A:utorfal 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=106230
utvaksen+A:utvaks 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=106654
uvelkommen+A:uvelkom 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=106832
vassblå+A:vassblå 537 ; ! LEMMA_ID=108035
vedlikehaldsfri+A:vedlikehaldsfri 536 ; ! LEMMA_ID=108506
vekegammal+A:vekegam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=108788
velboren+A:velbor 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=108979
velskriven+A:velskriv 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=109139
vidarekommen+A:vidarekom 579 ; ! LEMMA_ID=110755
villstyren+A:villstyr 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=111143
åleten+A:ålet 572H ; ! LEMMA_ID=114433
årsgammal+A:årsgam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=114733
ørgammal+A:ørgam 534 ; ! LEMMA_ID=113955
ørliten+A:ør 663 ; ! LEMMA_ID=113968
øyen+A:ø 649 ; ! LEMMA_ID=114111
